Tables/Contraction/ru.ctb
always \s– 36
always \s- 36
always ­ 36
repeatable ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36
always \s— 36


always … 256-256-256
always ‹ 246
always › 135
prepunc „ 236
postpunc „ 356
prepunc “ 236
postpunc “ 356
always ‘ 236
always ’ 356

always « 236
always » 356
prepunc ‟ 236
postpunc ‟ 356
prepunc ” 236
prepunc " 236
postpunc ” 356
postpunc " 356
prepunc ' 236
postpunc ' 356
